Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1019
Domestic administration, defined.

Domestic administration means the performance of any or all of the practices of cosmetology or nail technology upon members of a person's immediate family.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 17;

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 8;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-356;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 281.